test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-I-motokáán_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - mo'tokááni - ok : # -m inanimate noun, head AEW NA1
     mo'tokááni+NI+Sg: mo'tokááni
     mo'tokááni+NI+Pl: mo'tokáánistsi
     mo'tokááni+NI+Non: mo'tokááni

     mo'tokááni+NI+Px1Sg+Sg: no'tokááni
     mo'tokááni+NI+Px1Sg+Pl: no'tokáánistsi
     mo'tokááni+NI+Px1Sg+Non: no'tokááni

     mo'tokááni+NI+Px1Pl+Sg: no'tokáánnaani
     mo'tokááni+NI+Px1Pl+Pl: no'tokáánnaanistsi
     mo'tokááni+NI+Px1Pl+Non: no'tokáánnaani

     mo'tokááni+NI+Px21Pl+Sg: ko'tokáánnooni
     mo'tokááni+NI+Px21Pl+Pl: ko'tokáánnoonistsi
     mo'tokááni+NI+Px21Pl+Non: ko'tokáánnooni

     mo'tokááni+NI+Px2Sg+Sg: ko'tokááni
     mo'tokááni+NI+Px2Sg+Pl: ko'tokáánistsi
     mo'tokááni+NI+Px2Sg+Non: ko'tokááni

     mo'tokááni+NI+Px2Pl+Sg: ko'tokáánoaawayi
     mo'tokááni+NI+Px2Pl+Pl: ko'tokáánoaawaistsi
     mo'tokááni+NI+Px2Pl+Non: ko'tokáánoaawai

     mo'tokááni+NI+Px3Sg+Sg: o'tokááni
     mo'tokááni+NI+Px3Sg+Pl: o'tokáánistsi
     mo'tokááni+NI+Px3Sg+Non: o'tokááni

     mo'tokááni+NI+Px3Pl+Sg: o'tokáánoaawayi
     mo'tokááni+NI+Px3Pl+Pl: o'tokáánoaawaistsi
     mo'tokááni+NI+Px3Pl+Non: o'tokáánoaawai
